apertium-tt-ba.tt.lexc
%{т%}              ! Realised as т before vowels, 0 otherwise
%{е%}              ! Realised as е/ы in some contexts, 0 otherwise

%>                 ! Morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Particles ; 
Copula ; 
Conjunctions ; 
Postpositions ; 
Postadverbs ;
Pronouns ; 
Determiners ; 
Numerals ; 
Nouns ; 
ProperNouns ;
Adjectives ; 
Adverbs ; 
Verbs ; 
Interjections ; 
Abbreviations ; 
Punctuation ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON ;

! NOTE: Some substantivized things might not have pl. form, numerals e.g. 
! (not too sure, because in Tatar they have it: 
! #1 <11 ones meaning pupils from a given class: # өчләр = "pupils from the 3. class" 
! #2 "Мин белгәндә аңа, мөгаен, _иллеләр_ тирәсе булгандыр."
!
! If they don't have pl. form; link them to N-INFL-COMMON; if they do - to SUBST.
!                                                                     /I.S./

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     CLITICS

LEXICON CLIT-OTHER            !FIXME:DISCUSS: make from this a separate clitics class for verbs

%+чы%<mod_foc%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT

%+да%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ;
%+мы%<qst%>:%>м%{I%} # ;
%+дыр%<part%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р # ;
!%+сы%<part%>:%>с%{I%} # ;    ! FIXME: check
CLIT-OTHER ;
# ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     NOMINAL INFLECTION (N-INFL-COMMON)

! The following combinations are possible:
!
! stem > case                                        : әти<nom> : әтине<acc>
!
! stem > poss-real > case                            : әтием<px1sg><nom> : әтиемне<px1sg><acc>
! stem > poss-real > ныкы/дагы/дай(*1)               : әтиемнеке/китабындагы,өегездәге/әтиемдәй
! stem > poss-real > ныкы/дагы > case                : Монда _эчеңдәгене_ тышка чыгарырга ярамый. (источник: musulman.su) 
! stem > poss-real > [ныкы]/дагы > poss-real > case  : _Эчендәгесе_(*3) – тышында, диләр андый кешеләр турында. (источник: beznen.ru)
!
! stem > ныкы/дагы/дай                               : әтинеке/әтидәге/әтидәй
! stem > ныкы/дагы(*2) > case                        : Бу соңгы _еллардагының_ өчтән икесе чамасы.
!
! *1. "ныкы" form in some Tatar grammars is called "predicative genitive".
!     Indeed, when not substantivized, it has predicative use:
!     "Бу яулык әнинеке." (vs "Әнинең яулыгы.")
! *2. "дай" is considered to be an adverbializer, so no case endings after it (=no <subst> reading).
! *3. This doesn't work atm (it's recursive), but it doesn't seem to be very frequent also;
!     Most likely it is restricted to px3sp.
 
LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: CLIT ;               ! - - -
%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}ң CLIT ;      ! -ның/-нең
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;   ! -га/-гә, -ка/-кә    ! -а/-ә in nouns with possessives in singular (see below)
%<acc%>:%>н%{I%} CLIT ;	      ! -ны/-не
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT ;  ! -дан/-дән, -тан/-тән, -нан/нән 
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT ;   ! -да/-дә, -та/-тә

!! китап
!! китапның
!! китапка
!! китапны
!! китаптан
!! китапта

LEXICON ADJ-DAGI

%<subst%>: CASE ; 
%<attr%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC

%<px%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASE ;        ! -ныкы/-неке
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} ADJ-DAGI ;    ! -дагы/-дәге, -тагы/-тәге
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;             ! -дай/-дәй, -тай/-тәй       

LEXICON CASE-ETC
CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
  
LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE-ETC ;                 ! -ым/-ем, -м
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE-ETC ;                 ! -ың/-ең, -ң
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;        ! -ы/е, -сы/-се
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;           ! -ыбыз/-ебез, -быз/-без
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;       ! -ыгыз/-егез, -гыз/-гез

CASE-ETC ; ! FIXME:NOTE:! this was temporarily put here because some gerunds and pronouns are linked
                        ! to POSS-REAL. They should be linked to SUBST actually (and they will) /I.S./ 

! In dative nouns with <px1sg> <px2sg> and <px3sp> gets an "-a" ending instead of "-га/-гә, -ка/-кә"
! In nouns with <px3sp> there is an enclitic "н" in most cases  
!! китабым      китабың	        китабы
!! китабымның   китабыңның      китабының
!! китабыма!    китабыңа!       китабы-н-а!     
!! китабымны    китабыңны       китабы-н      ! китабы-н-ы is an old form. Only in poetry :)
!! китабымнан   китабыңнан      китабы-н-нан
!! китабымда    китабыңда       китабы-н-да

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON 
POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS (beginning)

LEXICON NLEX

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUMLEX

%<num%>: # ; 
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST ; 
%<num%>%<part%>:%>%{A%}р SUBST ; 

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>: # ;

LEXICON NPCOGMLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPCOGMFLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPANTMLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPANTFLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPTOPLEX

%<np%>%<top%>: CASE ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION (for verbal adjectives A2 should be used)
!                                                               (a separate ADJ-COMMON might be even better, see kaz.lexc) 
! FIXME: this section needs refactoring
!! e.g. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of ADJ-LEVELS class

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;
CLIT ;

LEXICON A1                 ! adjectives that can be both substantivized and andverbialized #! яхшы

%<adj%>: CLIT ; 
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ; 

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "Яхшы яхшыны тудыра." 
!%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;  !# яхшыракны таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# "Тиз янган тиз сүнгән."
!%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;    !# "Бәла бәхеттән тизрәк йөри."

LEXICON A2                 ! (?derived/not fully lexicalized) adjectives without adverbial reading #! язгы

%<adj%>: CLIT ;
!%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ; ! they also seem not to take comp. level !# *язгырак

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "Ул 14-25 яшьлекләргә бирелә." 
!%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;

LEXICON A3                 ! adjectives with (only) predicative use     !# бар, юк 
                           ! FIXME:NOTE: Maybe this class is not really needed, because it turned out :) that
                           ! even "бар" and "юк" can take case endings: !# "Хатыны юкның якыны юк."
                                                                        !# "Эше барның ашы бар."   
%<adj%>: CLIT ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION

LEXICON V-PERS-S1 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ; ! FIXME: Check 'Ни өчен беләсезме?' ! <frm><sg> and <frm><pl> are the same forms in Tatar; so maybe <frm><sp> would be better /I.S./
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2
!! кыска төрләнеш
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>к CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3-NO1SG

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;
V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 

LEXICON Nouns 
агросәнәгать:агросәнәгать NLEX ; ! ""
ансамбль:ансамбль NLEX ; ! ""
атналык:атналык NLEX ; ! ""
балалык:балалык NLEX ; ! ""
берлек:берлек NLEX ; ! ""
бит:бит NLEX ; ! "" 
вазыйфа:вазыйфа NLEX ; ! ""
дивар:дивар NLEX ; ! "" 
идея:идея NLEX ; ! "" 
йорт:йорт NLEX ; ! "" 
киләчәк:киләчәк NLEX ; ! "" 
куәт:куәт NLEX ; ! ""
көтүче:көтүче NLEX ; ! ""
мәйдан:мәйдан NLEX ; ! ""
офицер:офицер NLEX ; ! ""
пыяла:пыяла NLEX ; ! ""
сизү:сизү NLEX ; ! ""
сәхнә:сәхнә NLEX ; ! ""
тип:тип NLEX ; ! ""
тәэсир:тәэсир NLEX ; ! "" 
фикер:фикер NLEX ; ! ""
хәер:хәер NLEX ; ! ""
шау-шу:шау-шу NLEX ; ! ""
юл:юл NLEX ; ! "" 
җил:җил NLEX ; ! "" 
әгъза:әгъза NLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Рәсәй:Рәсәй NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Казан:Казан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Уфа:Уфа NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
АКШ:АКШ NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Германия:Германия NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Аурупа:Аурупа NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Америка:Америка NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Санкт-Петербург:Санкт-Петербург NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Ленинград:Ленинград NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Дон:Дон NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Әфганстан:Әфганстан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Герат:Герат NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Новгород:Новгород NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Чиләбе:Чиләбе NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Урал:Урал NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Чечня:Чечня NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Агыйдел:Агыйдел NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Алжир:Алжир NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Атайсал:Атайсал NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Авыргазы:Авыргазы NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Байкоңыр:Байкоңыр NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Байтул:Байтул NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Балакатай:Балакатай NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Балтика:Балтика NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Беларусь:Беларусь NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Бүздәк:Бүздәк NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Азат:Азат NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Айнур:Айнур NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Айрат:Айрат NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Александр:Александр NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Алексей:Алексей NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Альберт:Альберт NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Анатолий:Анатолий NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Андрей:Андрей NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Артур:Артур NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Атайсал:Атайсал NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Атайсал:Атайсал NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Борис:Борис NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Виктор:Виктор NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Владимир:Владимир NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Гайнетдин:Гайнетдин NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Евгений:Евгений NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Кирилл:Кирилл NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Марат:Марат NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Михаил:Михаил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Равил:Равил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Радмир:Радмир NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Рәҗәп:Рәҗәп NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Рөстәм:Рөстәм NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Тимерҗан:Тимерҗан NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Юрий:Юрий NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Әхмәт:Әхмәт NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Айгөл:Айгөл NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Айзирә:Айзирә NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Алина:Алина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Алла:Алла NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Альбина:Альбина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Анна:Анна NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Гөлнара:Гөлнара NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Ирина:Ирина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Лилия:Лилия NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Әхмәтов:Әхмәтов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Балабанов:Балабанов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Зубков:Зубков NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Исхаков:Исхаков NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Маврин:Маврин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Нәбиуллин:Нәбиуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Путин:Путин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Путин:Путин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Рәҗәпов:Рәҗәпов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Сәфиуллин:Сәфиуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Таҗиев:Таҗиев NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Толкачев:Толкачев NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Тупиков:Тупиков NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Хәмитов:Хәмитов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Хәсәнов:Хәсәнов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Афонин:Афонин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Әсадуллин:Әсадуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Башаров:Башаров NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Әүбәкирова:Әүбәкирова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Байкова:Байкова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Баталова:Баталова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Башкортова:Башкортова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Биишева:Биишева NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Бабич:Бабич NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Орджоникидзе:Орджоникидзе NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Семивеличенко:Семивеличенко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives 
бар:бар A2 ; ! ""
юк:юк A2 ; ! ""
аз:аз A1 ; ! ""
ак:ак A1 ; ! ""
аллы:аллы A1 ; ! ""
асыл:асыл A1 ; ! ""
байтак% зур:байтак% зур A1 ; ! ""
бертуган:бертуган A1 ; ! ""
булдыклы:булдыклы A1 ; ! ""
бөтен:бөтен A1 ; ! ""
гаҗәеп:гаҗәеп A1 ; ! ""
ерак:ерак A1 ; ! ""
икътисадый:икътисадый A1 ; ! ""
искитмәле:искитмәле A1 ; ! ""
йомык:йомык A1 ; ! ""
караңгы:караңгы A1 ; ! ""
киләчәк:киләчәк A1 ; ! ""
коточкыч:коточкыч A1 ; ! ""
кыйммәтле:кыйммәтле A1 ; ! ""
мескен:мескен A1 ; ! ""
нәүбәтле:нәүбәтле A1 ; ! ""
сугыш:сугыш A1 ; ! ""
территориаль:территориаль A1 ; ! ""
түбән:түбән A1 ; ! ""
хайвани:хайвани A1 ; ! ""
шурави:шурави A1 ; ! ""
якынча:якынча A1 ; ! ""
җәмәгать:җәмәгать A1 ; ! ""
өзлексез:өзлексез A1 ; ! ""
